Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE C. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM

CHAPTER 72. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS OF THE PERMIAN BASIN

Sec. 72.01. ESTABLISHMENT. The Board of Regents of The University of Texas System shall establish and maintain a fully state-supported coeducational institution of higher education to be known as The University of Texas of the Permian Basin and to be organized to teach undergraduate- and graduate-level courses but the Board of Regents may establish The University of Texas of the Permian Basin as a general academic teaching institution, as defined by Section 61.003 of this code, offering a standard four-year undergraduate program.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3167, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1684, ch. 314, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 77, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 72.02. COURSES AND DEGREES. The board of regents may prescribe courses leading to such customary degrees as are offered at leading American universities and may award those degrees. It is the intent of the legislature that those degrees include baccalaureate and master's degrees and their equivalents; but no department, school, or degree program shall be instituted except with the prior approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3167, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 77, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 72.03. OTHER RULES AND REGULATIONS. The board of regents shall make other rules and regulations for the operation, control, and management of the university, including the determination of the number of students that shall be admitted to any school, college, or degree-granting program, as may be necessary for the conduct of the university as one of the first class.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3167, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 72.04. JOINT APPOINTMENTS. The board of regents is specifically authorized to make joint appointments in the university and in other institutions under its governance. The salary of any such person who receives a joint appointment shall be apportioned to the appointing institution on the basis of services rendered.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3167, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 72.05. BOARD MAY ACCEPT GRANTS AND GIFTS. The board of regents may accept and administer, on terms and conditions satisfactory to it, grants or gifts of property, including real estate or money, or any part of existing junior college facilities that may be tendered to it in aid of the planning, establishment, conduct, and operation of The University of Texas of the Permian Basin, and in aid of research and teaching at the university. The board of regents may accept from the federal government or any foundation, trust fund, corporation, or individual donations, gifts, and grants, including real estate, buildings, libraries, laboratories, apparatus, equipment, records, or money for the use and benefit of the university.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3168, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 72.06. LOCATION. (a) The board of regents shall establish The University of Texas of the Permian Basin at a site consisting of at least 200 acres, unless otherwise specifically acceptable to the board.

(b) The site shall, within a reasonable length of time, be accessible to roads, and shall be accessible to required utilities at the perimeter of the site. The site shall be accessible to, and within a reasonable distance of, the present site of the Odessa College Campus in Odessa.

(c) The board shall select a site which is in Ector County; however, the site may extend into an adjoining county. If, within the discretion of the board, those sites made available within the provisions of this chapter are not suitable and other sites are suitable, then the board may accept and acquire a similar site wholly or partly in an adjoining county; however, that site may not be outside a 12-mile radius from the present campus of Odessa College in Odessa.

(d) The board is authorized to accept and acquire and shall accept and acquire a site for such college within the provisions of this chapter and the land for the site shall be deeded by proper conveyance free and clear of debt, to the state.

(e) The board shall in no event delay the acquisition of land for the institution created by the provisions of this chapter later than December 31, 1969.

(f) The board must follow the provisions of this chapter with respect to site and any decision reached to the contrary shall be null and void and all laws to the contrary are hereby expressly repealed.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3168, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 72.07. UNDERGRADUATE ADMISSIONS. (a) If The University of Texas of the Permian Basin is established as a general academic teaching institution under Section 72.01 of this code, the board of regents shall provide for the admission to the university of entering freshmen and of undergraduate transfer students with less than 54 semester hours of college credit at the university.

(b) In addition to other qualitative criteria that the board of regents may establish, the board shall provide that the admission criteria to the university for entering freshmen and for undergraduate transfer students be no less stringent than the criteria for admission to another four-year general academic teaching institution in The University of Texas System for those students.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 77, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.